Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 10 Drug Repository Program

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 31/SB 340, effective April 29, 2014, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article. The former article consisted of Code Sections 31-8-301 through 31-8-306, relating to the Georgia Alzheimer’s and Related Dementias State Plan Task Force, and was based on Ga. L. 2013, p. 586, § 1/SB 14.

31-8-300.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Controlled substance” means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor in Schedules I through V of Code Sections 16-13-25 through 16-13-29 and Schedules I through V of 21 C.F.R. Part 1308.

“Eligible patient” means an individual who is indigent, uninsured, underinsured, or enrolled in a public assistance health benefits program, in accordance with criteria established by the Department of Public Health pursuant to Code Section 31-8-304. Other individuals may be considered eligible patients if the need for donated drugs for indigent, uninsured, underinsured, and public assistance health benefits program patients is less than the supply of donated drugs.

“Eligible recipient” means a pharmacy, hospital, federally qualified health center, nonprofit clinic, or other entity meeting the criteria established by the Department of Public Health pursuant to Code Section 31-8-304.

“Health care facility” means a:

Nursing home licensed pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 7 of this title;

Personal care home licensed pursuant to Code Section 31-7-12;

Assisted living community licensed pursuant to Code Section 31-7-12.2;

Hospice licensed pursuant to Article 9 of Chapter 7 of this title; and

Home health agency licensed pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 7 of this title.

“Health care professional” means any of the following who provide medical, dental, or other health related diagnosis, care, or treatment:

Physicians licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43;

Registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed under Chapter 26 of Title 43;

Physician assistants licensed under Chapter 34 of Title 43;

Dentists and dental hygienists licensed under Chapter 11 of Title 43;

Optometrists licensed under Chapter 30 of Title 43; and

Pharmacists licensed under Chapter 4 of Title 26.

“Hospital” means a facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 7 of this title.

“Program” means the drug repository program established pursuant to Code Section 31-8-301.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-300

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 524, § 1/HB 897.

31-8-301.
Drug repository program established; criteria and requirements for unused over-the-counter and prescription drugs.

The Department of Public Health shall establish a drug repository program to accept and dispense over-the-counter and prescription drugs donated for the purpose of being dispensed to eligible patients.

Drugs shall only be dispensed pursuant to the program if:

For prescription drugs, they do not expire before the completion of the medication by the eligible patient based on the prescribing health care professional’s directions for use and, for over-the-counter drugs, they do not expire before use by the eligible patient based on the directions for use on the manufacturer’s label; and

The drugs were donated in unopened tamper-evident packaging as defined by United States Pharmacopeia General Chapter 659, Packaging and Storage Requirements, including but not limited to unopened unit-dose and multiple-dose packaging.

The following drugs shall not be donated to the program:

Controlled substances;

Drugs subject to a federal Food and Drug Administration managed risk evaluation and mitigation strategy pursuant to Section 355-1 of Title 21 of the United States Code if inventory transfer is prohibited by such strategy; or

Drugs that there is reason to believe are adulterated pursuant to Code Section 26-3-7.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-301

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 524, § 1/HB 897.

31-8-302.
Procedures for donation and dispensing of unused over-the-counter and prescription drugs.

Any person, including a drug manufacturer, wholesaler, reverse distributor pharmacy, third-party logistics provider, government entity, hospital, or health care facility, may donate over-the-counter and prescription drugs to the program. The drugs shall be donated to an eligible recipient that voluntarily elects to participate in the program. Nothing in this or any other Code section shall require an eligible recipient to participate in the program.

An eligible recipient may do any of the following:

Accept and dispense donated drugs to eligible patients. Prescription drugs shall only be dispensed pursuant to a valid prescription drug order. Eligible patients who are indigent, uninsured, underinsured, or enrolled in a public assistance health benefits program in accordance with criteria established by the Department of Public Health pursuant to Code Section 31-8-304 shall be prioritized over other individuals;

Transfer donated drugs to another eligible recipient participating in the program or to a drug repository program operated by another state;

Repackage donated drugs as necessary for dispensing, administration, or transfers; and

Replenish drugs previously dispensed or administered to eligible patients.

An eligible recipient that accepts donated drugs shall comply with all applicable federal laws and laws of this state dealing with storage and distribution of dangerous drugs and shall inspect all drugs prior to dispensing them to determine that they are not adulterated.

An eligible recipient may charge a handling fee established in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the Department of Public Health pursuant to Code Section 31-8-304; provided, however, that any such fee shall not exceed the reasonable costs of participating in the program.

Drugs donated to the program shall not be resold; provided, however, that reimbursement for any fee charged as authorized pursuant to this article by a health plan or pharmacy benefits manager for donated drugs shall not constitute reselling. Nothing in this article shall require a health plan or pharmacy benefits manager to be reimbursed for donated drugs.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-302

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 524, § 1/HB 897.

31-8-303.
Limited liability.

When complying with the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, unless an action or omission constitutes willful or wanton misconduct, the following persons or entities shall not be subject to criminal or civil prosecution, criminal or civil liability for injury, death, or loss to person or property, other criminal or civil action, or disciplinary actions by licensing, professional, or regulatory agencies:

A person that donates or gives drugs to an eligible recipient, including a drug manufacturer, wholesaler, reverse distributor pharmacy, third-party logistics provider, government entity, hospital, or health care facility;

An eligible recipient;

A health care professional who prescribes or dispenses a donated drug;

The Department of Public Health and State Board of Pharmacy;

An intermediary that helps administer the program by facilitating the donation or transfer of drugs to eligible recipients;

A manufacturer or repackager of a donated drug; and

Any employee, volunteer, trainee, or other staff of individuals and entities listed in paragraphs (1) through (6) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-303

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 524, § 1/HB 897.

31-8-304.
Rules and regulations; waiver.

No later than January 1, 2017, the Department of Public Health shall establish rules and regulations to implement the program according to the provisions of this article for criteria for eligible recipients; standards and procedures for safely storing and dispensing donated drugs; criteria for eligible patients to receive donated drugs, including priority for patients who are indigent, uninsured, underinsured, or enrolled in a public assistance health benefits program; and handling fees that may be charged by eligible recipients to eligible patients to cover restocking, marketing, administrative, and dispensing costs.

The Department of Public Health may waive any provision of this article if it determines that the waiver is in the interest of public health and safety.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-304

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 524, § 1/HB 897.